Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 3 Antiterrorism Task Force

35-3-60.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Antiterrorism Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35, effective February 3, 1984, repealed former Code Section

35-3-60

, which dealt with legislative findings (see now O.C.G.A. §

35-3-61(a)

), and enacted current Code Section

35-3-60

. Former Code Section 35-3-60 was based on Ga. L. 1983, p. 393, § 1.

35-3-61.
Legislative findings; purpose; liberal construction.

This article is enacted as a direct response to the high level of reactivation of violent and terroristic acts against persons residing within the State of Georgia and in response to the outcry of the communities for assistance from the State of Georgia in combating these violent and terroristic acts.

The purpose of this article shall be to assist law enforcement personnel in the State of Georgia to identify, investigate, arrest, and prosecute individuals or groups of individuals who illegally threaten, harass, terrorize, or otherwise injure or damage the person or property of persons on the basis of their race, national origin, or religious persuasion.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this article be interpreted and construed liberally to accomplish its purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35.

Editor’s notes.

The language formerly contained in subsection (a) of this Code section prior to the 1984 amendment is now contained in Code Section 35-3-60. See Code Section 35-3-60 and notes thereto.

35-3-62.
“Terroristic act” defined.

As used in this article, the term “terroristic act” means an act which constitutes a crime against the person or against the residence of an individual which is committed with the specific intent of and may reasonably be expected to instill fear into such person or persons or which is committed for the purpose of restraining that person or those persons from exercising their rights under the Constitution and laws of this state and the United States and any illegal act directed at other persons or their property because of those persons’ political beliefs or political affiliations.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35.

35-3-63.
Creation of task force; purposes.

There is established a special Antiterrorism Task Force within the Georgia Bureau of Investigation. This Antiterrorism Task Force shall operate independently of any other investigative operations within the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and shall devote itself to the tasks of identifying, investigating, arresting, and prosecuting individuals or groups of individuals who perform terroristic acts against a person or his residence on the basis of such person’s race, national origin, or religious persuasion.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35.

35-3-64.
Confidentiality of investigative reports and identity of agents.

All efforts shall be made to maintain the confidentiality of the investigative efforts of the Antiterrorism Task Force and the identity of agents who operate in undercover assignments. Information may, however, be shared with other law enforcement agencies when, in the sole discretion of the director, the sharing of such information would not compromise the successful completion of the investigation or cases being made.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 5/SB 146.

35-3-65.
Authority to work with other law enforcement agencies.

The Antiterrorism Task Force shall be authorized to work with and seek the assistance of other law enforcement agencies when, in the sole discretion of the director, such assistance would not compromise the successful completion of the investigations or cases being made.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 6/SB 146.